Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1509
Department; needs and eligibility criteria; factors.

The department, in considering the needs and eligibility criteria of families and disabled persons, shall consider various factors, including, but not limited to:

(1) Total family income, except that the amount which the spouse may designate as provided in section 68-922 shall be excluded in determining total family income per month;

(2) The cost of providing supplemental services to the family or the disabled person;

(3) The need for each program or service received by the family or the disabled person;

(4) The eligibility of the family or the disabled person for other support programs;

(5) The costs of providing for the family or the disabled person in an independent living situation, notwithstanding the special circumstances of providing for a disabled person;

(6) The number of persons in the family; and

(7) The availability of insurance to cover the cost of needed programs and services.

If assets have been designated for an individual in accordance with section 68-922, such assets shall not be considered in determining the eligibility for support of the individual's disabled spouse.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 9;

Laws 1988, LB 419, § 16;

Laws 1989, LB 362, § 16;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 71.